Vermont, session 2025-2026, S236.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 224 is amended to read:
§ 224. FOURTH-CLASS LICENSES
* * *
VT LEG #385891 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.236
2026 Page 2 of 3
(b) At each licensed location, a fourth-class licensee may sell by the
unopened container or distribute by the glass, with or without charge, alcoholic
beverages manufactured by the licensee.
(1) A licensee may, for consumption at the licensed premises or
location, distribute the following amounts of alcoholic beverages to a retail
customer:
(A) at a farmer’s market location, not more than:
(i) two ounces of malt beverages, vinous beverages, or ready-to-
drink spirits beverages with a total of eight ounces; and
(B)(ii) no more than one-quarter ounce of spirits or fortified wine
with a total of one ounce; or
(B) at a tasting room and retail shop, not more than:
(i) an aggregate total of 16 ounces of malt beverages or hard cider;
(ii) an aggregate total of 12 ounces of vinous beverages or ready-
to-drink spirits beverages; and
(iii) one-quarter ounce of spirits or fortified wine with a total of
two ounces.
* * *
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 271 is amended to read:
§ 271. MANUFACTURER’S OR RECTIFIER’S LICENSE
* * *
VT LEG #385891 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.236
2026 Page 3 of 3
(d)(1) The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant to a licensed
manufacturer or rectifier a first-class license or a third-class license, or both,
permitting the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages to the public at an
establishment located at the manufacturer’s or rectifier’s licensed facility,
provided the manufacturer or rectifier owns or has direct control over that
establishment.
(2) A licensed manufacturer of malt beverages or vinous beverages may
operate up to two licensed establishments pursuant to this subsection that are
located at the licensed manufacturing facility or on property that is owned by
the licensee and is contiguous with the parcel of land on which the licensed
manufacturing facility is located, provided the manufacturer owns or has direct
control over both establishments.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385891 v.1